en: Outdoor Furniture Sets
xx: Outdoor Furniture Sets
cs: Sady venkovního nábytku
da: Havemøbelsæt
de: Gartenmöbelgarnituren
es: Conjuntos de mobiliario de exterior
fr: Ensembles de meubles d'extérieur
it: Set di mobili da esterno
ja: 屋外用家具セット
nl: Sets van buitenmeubelen
no: Sett med utendørsmøbler
pl: Zestawy mebli zewnętrznych
pt: Cojuntos de móveis para exteriores
ru: Наборы садовой мебели
sv: Utomhusmöbelset
tr: Bahçe Mobilya Takımları

en: Outdoor Ottomans
xx: Outdoor Ottomans
cs: Venkovní otomany
da: Udendørs ottomaner
de: Gartenhocker
es: Otomanas de exterior
fr: Poufs d'extérieur
it: Ottomane da esterno
ja: 屋外用オットマン
nl: Buitenpoefs
no: Utendørsdivaner
pl: Otomany na zewnątrz
pt: Pufes para exteriores
ru: Садовые оттоманки
sv: Utomhusottomaner
tr: Bahçe Sedirleri

en: Outdoor Seating
xx: Outdoor Seating
cs: Venkovní sedací nábytek
da: Udendørs siddepladser
de: Gartensitzmöbel
es: Asientos de exterior
fr: Sièges d'extérieur
it: Mobili-sedie da esterno
ja: 屋外用ベンチ・椅子
nl: Buitenzitjes
no: Utendørs sittemøbler
pl: Siedzenia ogrodowe
pt: Assentos para exteriores
ru: Садовая мебель для сидения
sv: Sittmöbler för utomhusbruk
tr: Bahçe Koltukları

en: Outdoor Benches
xx: Outdoor Benches
cs: Venkovní lavičky
da: Havebænke
de: Gartenbänke
es: Bancos de exterior
fr: Bancs d'extérieur
it: Panchine da esterno
ja: 屋外用ベンチ
nl: Parkbankjes
no: Utendørsbenker
pl: Ławki ogrodowe
pt: Bancos para exteriores
ru: Садовые скамьи
sv: Utomhusbänkar
tr: Bahçe Bankları

en: Outdoor Chairs
xx: Outdoor Chairs
cs: Venkovní židle
da: Havestole
de: Gartenstühle
es: Sillas de exterior
fr: Chaises d'extérieur
it: Sedie da esterno
ja: 屋外用椅子
nl: Buitenstoelen
no: Utendørsstoler
pl: Krzesła ogrodowe
pt: Cadeiras para exteriores
ru: Садовые стулья
sv: Utomhusstolar
tr: Bahçe Sandalyeleri

en: Outdoor Sectional Sofa Units
xx: Outdoor Sectional Sofa Units
cs: Prvky sestav zahradních pohovek
da: Enheder til udendørs modulsofa
de: Gartensofaelemente
es: Sofás modulares de exterior
fr: Éléments pour canapés modulables d'extérieur
it: Unità per divano componibile da esterno
ja: 屋外用組立式ソファー・ユニット
nl: Modulaire buitenbanken
no: Sofaseksjoner til utebruk
pl: Zewnętrzne sofy modułowe
pt: Unidades de sofá com módulos externos
ru: Садовые секционные диваны
sv: Moduler till utomhussoffa
tr: Ayrılabilir Bahçe Koltuğu Üniteleri

en: Outdoor Sofas
xx: Outdoor Sofas
cs: Zahradní pohovky
da: Udendørs sofaer
de: Gartensofas
es: Sofás de exterior
fr: Canapés d'extérieur
it: Divani per esterno
ja: 屋外用ソファー
nl: Buitenbanken
no: Utendørssofaer
pl: Sofy ogrodowe
pt: Sofás para exteriores
ru: Садовые диваны
sv: Utomhussoffor
tr: Bahçe Kanepeleri

en: Sunloungers
xx: Sunloungers
cs: Opalovací lehátka
da: Solvogne
de: Sonnenliegen
es: Tumbonas
fr: Bains de soleil
it: Lettini prendisole
ja: サンラウンジャー
nl: Ligstoelen
no: Solstoler
pl: Leżaki
pt: Cadeiras de praia
ru: Кресла-шезлонги
sv: Solstolar
tr: Şezlonglar

en: Outdoor Storage Boxes
xx: Outdoor Storage Boxes
cs: Venkovní skladovací boxy
da: Udendørs opbevaringskasser
de: Aufbewahrungsbehälter für draußen
es: Cajas de almacenaje para exteriores
fr: Coffres de jardin
it: Contenitori per esterno
ja: 屋外用収納ボックス
nl: Opbergboxen voor buiten
no: Oppbevaringsbokser for hageutstyr og -møbler
pl: Pojemniki i skrzynie ogrodowe
pt: Baús para armazenamento externo
ru: Уличные коробки для хранения
sv: Förvaringslådor för utomhusbruk
tr: Açık Hava Depolama Kutuları

en: Outdoor Tables
xx: Outdoor Tables
cs: Zahradní stoly
da: Haveborde
de: Gartentische
es: Mesas de exterior
fr: Tables d'extérieur, Table de jardin, Meuble de bar
it: Tavoli da esterno
ja: 屋外用テーブル
nl: Tuintafels
no: Utendørsbord
pl: Stoły ogrodowe
pt: Mesas para exteriores
ru: Садовые столы
sv: Utomhusbord
tr: Bahçe Masaları

en: Outdoor Furniture Accessories
xx: Outdoor Furniture Accessories
cs: Venkovní nábytek – příslušenství
da: Havemøbler – tilbehør
de: Gartenmöbelzubehör
es: Accesorios para mobiliario de exterior
fr: Accessoires pour meubles d'extérieur
it: Accessori per mobili da esterni
ja: 屋外用家具関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor buitenmeubilair
no: Tilbehør til utendørsmøbler
pl: Akcesoria do mebli zewnętrznych
pt: Acessórios para móveis de jardim
ru: Принадлежности для садовой мебели
sv: Tillbehör till utomhusmöbler
tr: Bahçe Mobilya Aksesuarları

en: Outdoor Furniture Covers
xx: Outdoor Furniture Covers
cs: Potahy na venkovní nábytek
da: Havemøbler – overtræk
de: Abdeckungen für Gartenmöbel
es: Fundas para mobiliario de exterior
fr: Housses pour meubles d'extérieur
it: Teloni per mobili da esterni
ja: 屋外用家具カバー
nl: Hoezen voor buitenmeubilair
no: Trekk til utendørsmøbler
pl: Pokrowce na meble zewnętrzne
pt: Capas para móveis de jardim
ru: Чехлы для садовой мебели
sv: Överdrag till utomhusmöbler
tr: Bahçe Mobilya Örtüleri

en: Room Divider Accessories
xx: Room Divider Accessories
cs: Pokojové dělicí stěny – příslušenství
da: Ruminddeler – tilbehør
de: Raumteilerzubehör
es: Accesorios para divisores de ambientes
fr: Accessoires pour la division de pièces
it: Accessori per la separazione di ambienti
ja: 間仕切り・パーティション関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor kamerafscheidingen
no: Tilbehør for skillevegger
pl: Akcesoria do przepierzeń
pt: Acessórios para divisórias
ru: Принадлежности для декоративных перегородок
sv: Tillbehör till rumsavdelare
tr: Oda Bölme Aksesuarları

en: Room Dividers
xx: Room Dividers
cs: Dělicí příčky
da: Ruminddelere
de: Raumteiler
es: Divisores de ambientes
fr: Séparateurs de pièces, Paravent, Cloisonette de séparation
it: Separè
ja: 間仕切り・パーティション
nl: Kamerafscheidingen
no: Skillevegger
pl: Przepierzenia
pt: Paredes divisórias
ru: Перегородки для помещений
sv: Rumsavdelare
tr: Oda Bölücüler

en: Shelving
xx: Shelving
cs: Police
da: Hylder
de: Regalsysteme
es: Estanterías
fr: Étagères, Étagère
it: Scaffalature
ja: 棚・シェルフ
nl: Planken
no: Hyller
pl: Półki i regały
pt: Estantes
ru: Стеллажи
sv: Hyllor
tr: Raflar

en: Bookcases & Standing Shelves
xx: Bookcases & Standing Shelves
cs: Knihovny
da: Bogskabe og reoler
de: Bücherregale & Bücherschränke
es: Librerías y estanterías
fr: Bibliothèques, Bibliothèque, Bibus
it: Librerie
ja: 本棚・シェルフ
nl: Boekenkasten
no: Bokhyller og stående hyller
pl: Regały i półki stojące
pt: Estantes para livros
ru: Книжные шкафы
sv: Bokhyllor och fristående hyllor
tr: Kitaplıklar ve Ayaklı Raflar

en: Wall Shelves & Ledges
xx: Wall Shelves & Ledges
cs: Nástěnné poličky a římsy
da: Væghylder og smalle hylder
de: Wandregale & Simse
es: Estantes y estanterías
fr: Étagères murales et corniches, Tablette murale, Corniche
it: Scaffali e mensole per pareti
ja: ウォールシェルフ
nl: Muurplanken en -richels
no: Vegghyller og -avsatser
pl: Półki ścienne
pt: Prateleiras
ru: Настенные полки
sv: Vägghyllor och fönsterbrädor
tr: Duvar Raf ve Çıkıntıları

en: Shelving Accessories
xx: Shelving Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k policím
da: Tilbehør til hylder
de: Regalzubehör
es: Accesorios para estanterías
fr: Accessoires pour étagères
it: Accessori per scaffali
ja: 棚・シェルフ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor planken
no: Tilbehør til hyller
pl: Akcesoria do półek i regałów
pt: Acessórios para prateleiras
ru: Принадлежности для стеллажей
sv: Tillbehör till hyllmöbler
tr: Raf Aksesuarları

en: Replacement Shelves
xx: Replacement Shelves
cs: Náhradní police
da: Erstatningshylder
de: Ersatzregale
es: Estanterías de repuesto
fr: Étagères de rechange
it: Scaffali di ricambio
ja: 棚板
nl: Vervangende planken
no: Hylleplater
pl: Półki zapasowe
pt: Prateleiras de substituição
ru: Запасные полки
sv: Reservhyllor
tr: Yedek Raflar

en: Sofa Accessories
xx: Sofa Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k pohovkám
da: Tilbehør til sofaer
de: Sofa-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para sofás
fr: Accessoires pour canapés
it: Accessori per divani
ja: ソファ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor sofa's
no: Sofatilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do sof
pt: Acessórios para sofá
ru: Принадлежности для соф
sv: Sofftillbehör
tr: Kanepe Aksesuarları